Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Marital and Family Therapy.

Sec. 08.63.010.
Board established.

There is established the Board of Marital and Family Therapy.

The board consists of three persons licensed under this chapter and two members of the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Sec. 08.63.020.
Board appointments.

The governor shall appoint the members of the board subject to confirmation by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Sec. 08.63.030.
Meetings.

The board shall hold an annual meeting and may hold special meetings at the call of the chair or a majority of the board members.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Sec. 08.63.040.
Removal of board members.

The governor may only remove a member of the board for good cause.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Sec. 08.63.050.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall

establish objective examination requirements and training and education requirements for persons who apply for a license to practice marital and family therapy;

examine applicants and issue licenses to qualified applicants;

establish continuing education requirements for license renewal;

adopt a code of ethical practice for marital and family therapy;

hold hearings and order the disciplinary sanction of a person who violates this chapter or a regulation of the board;

ensure that licensees are aware of the requirements of AS

47.17.020

;

establish standards for supervisors and supervision under this chapter;

enforce the provisions of this chapter and adopt regulations necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.

The board may order a licensed marital and family therapist to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the board has credible evidence sufficient to conclude that the marital and family therapist’s physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 152 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraph (9) was renumbered as (8) in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (8).

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 19, art. 1.

For supervised practice, see 12 AAC 19, art. 2.

For license renewal and continuing education, see 12 AAC 19, art. 3.

Sec. 08.63.060.
Administrative Procedure Act.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations and proceedings under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For supervised practice, see 12 AAC 19, art. 2.